Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4545.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 109o. Subject to federal law, the medical assistance program must comply with section 12 of the prescription drug cost and affordability review act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S00487'25) or House Bill No. 4544 (request no. H00487'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.